Hawaii statutes.
§806-40 Document of title. In any
indictment for stealing or for any fraudulent purpose, destroying, canceling,
obliterating, or concealing the whole or any part of any document of title to
lands, it shall be sufficient to allege the document to be or to contain
evidence of the title or of part of the title of the person or of some one of
the persons having an interest whether vested or contingent, legal or
equitable, in the real estate to which the same relates, and to mention the
real estate or some part thereof. [L 1876, c 40, §23; RL 1925, §4059; RL 1935,
§5514; RL 1945, §10816; RL 1955, §258-26; HRS §711-40; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next